Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6010
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 745;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 638.